Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 34
COLORADO COOPERATIVE
EXTENSION SERVICE

23-34-101 to 23-34-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article repealed, p. 550, § 7, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1979. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2007, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this article were relocated to part 7 of article 31 of this title. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following those sections relocated to part 7 and the comparative tables located in the back of the index.